src/fst/affixes/irregularverbs.lexc
!! !!! Irregular verbs

!! These are the "irregular" verbs, which are mostly prefixing or copular.

!! The copulas are mostly suffixing, and all the other verbs include person
!! prefixes, and agreement on suffixes for person. Tense and mood are
!! expressed with complex stem alternations that are no longer 100% productive,
!! and progressive is formed from a derivational stem, with no person prefixes.

!! NB: After adding in some additional morphological boundaries for some of the
!! verbs, it should become obvious that some more simplification in amount
!! of lexica is possible. Prefixing verbs often have multiple stems for
!! separate tenses, and more or less get the same person prefixes in
!! full and reduced paradigms. The only trick there is it requires more
!! flag diacritics, to make sure that the prefix matches the suffix.

!! TODO: omg


LEXICON IrregularVerbs
    Copulas ;
    prefixing ;     ! TODO: prefixing verbs

LEXICON Copulas
    Ah ;
    MA ;

LEXICON MA !!= @CODE@ _ma_ and related inflected forms.
    ma+V+Neg+Pres+3SgM:muu Clitics ; ! mu´u ?
    ma+V+1Sg+Ind+Pres+Prog+Neg:ma´ayo´ Clitics ;
    ma+V+2Sg+Ind+Pres+Prog+Neg:ma´yso´ Clitics ;
    ma+V+2Sg+Ind+Pres+Prog+Neg:ma´ysi´d Clitics ;
    ma+V+3SgM+Ind+Pres+Prog+Neg:ma´ayo´ Clitics ;
    ma+V+3SgF+Ind+Pres+Prog+Neg:ma´ayso´ Clitics ;
    ma+V+1Pl+Ind+Pres+Prog+Neg:ma´yno´ Clitics ;
    ma+V+2Pl+Ind+Pres+Prog+Neg:ma´ysaan´´ Clitics ;
    ma+V+3Pl+Ind+Pres+Prog+Neg:ma´ayaan´´ Clitics ;

!! !!! Ah

!! _ah_ is a verb meaning 'to exist', but can function as a copula. It is
!! inflected in all tenses, but has long and short forms.

LEXICON Ah !!= @CODE@ Inflections in tense.
    Ah_Neg  ;
    Ah_Pres ;
    Ah_Long ;
    Ah_Rel ;
    +V+Imper: Ah_Imper ;
    Ah_Clause_Case ;
    Ah_Past ;
    Ah_Opt ;
    Ah_Cond ;


! TODO: more relative forms? nahay?
LEXICON Ah_Rel
    ah+V+Pres+Rel+3SgM:ah         Clitics ;

LEXICON Ah_Neg
    ah+V+Neg:ahayn      Clitics ;

    ! TODO: unsure about tense here, may be no tense
    ah+V+Past+1Sg+Neg:lahayn´ Clitics ;
    ah+V+Past+2Sg+Neg:lahayn´ Clitics ;
    ah+V+Past+3SgM+Neg:lahayn´ Clitics ;
    ah+V+Past+3SgF+Neg:lahayn´ Clitics ;
    ah+V+Past+1Pl+Neg:lahayn´ Clitics ;
    ah+V+Past+2Pl+Neg:lahayn´ Clitics ;
    ah+V+Past+3Pl+Neg:lahayn´ Clitics ;

    ah+V+Pres+1Sg+Neg:ihi´  Clitics ;
    ah+V+Pres+2Sg+Neg:ihi´d Clitics ;
    ah+V+Pres+3SgM+Neg:aha´ Clitics ;
    ah+V+Pres+3SgF+Neg:aha´ Clitics ;

    ah+V+Pres+1PlIncl+Neg:ihi´n  Clitics ;
    ah+V+Pres+1PlExcl+Neg:ihi´n  Clitics ;
    ah+V+Pres+2Pl+Neg:ihidi´n    Clitics ;
    ah+V+Pres+3Pl+Neg:aha´  Clitics ;

! TODO: lahaado
! TODO: what are these exactly?
LEXICON Ah_Long
    ah:ahaa V3A_VerbMorf ; !

    ! ahaataa
    ! ahaatid
    ! ahaadaa
    ! ahaataa

    ! ahaannaa
    ! ahaataan
    ! ahaadaan


LEXICON Ah_Pres
    ah+V+Inf:ahaa´n         # ;
    ah+V+Ind+Pres+1Sg:ahay        # ;
    ah+V+Ind+Pres+2Sg:tahay        # ;
    ah+V+Ind+Pres+3SgM:yahay    # ;
    ah+V+Ind+Pres+3SgF:tahay     # ;
    ah+V+Ind+Pres+1PlIncl:nahay     # ;
    ah+V+Ind+Pres+1PlExcl:nahay     # ;
    ah+V+Ind+Pres+2Pl:tihiin       # ;
    ah+V+Ind+Pres+3Pl:yihiin       # ;

LEXICON Ah_Imper
    +Sg:aha´w       Clitics ;
    +Pl:ahaa´da     Clitics ;

    +Neg+Sg:ahaa´nin     Clitics ;
    +Neg+Pl:ahaani´na Clitics ;


LEXICON Ah_Past
    Ah_Past_Full ;
    Ah_Past_Reduced ;

LEXICON Ah_Past_Full
    ah+V+1Sg+Ind+Past:ahaa        # ;
    ah+V+2Sg+Ind+Past:ahayd        # ;
    ah+V+3SgM+Ind+Past:ahaa    # ;
    ah+V+3SgF+Ind+Past:ahayd     # ;

    ah+V+1Pl+Incl+Ind+Past:ahayn     # ;
    ah+V+1Pl+Excl+Ind+Past:ahayn     # ;
    ah+V+2Pl+Ind+Past:ahaydeen     # ;
    ah+V+3Pl+Ind+Past:ahaayeen       # ;

! TODO: These are reduced forms for focus
LEXICON Ah_Past_Reduced
    ah+V+1Sg+Ind+Past+Red:ahaa´       # ;
    ah+V+2Sg+Ind+Past+Red:ahaa´        # ;
    ah+V+3SgM+Ind+Past+Red:ahaa´    # ;
    ah+V+3SgF+Ind+Past+Red:ahay´d     # ;

    ah+V+1Pl+Incl+Ind+Past+Red:ahay´n     # ;
    ah+V+1Pl+Excl+Ind+Past+Red:ahayn     # ;
    ah+V+2Pl+Ind+Past+Red:ahaa´    # ;
    ah+V+3Pl+Ind+Past+Red:ahaa´       # ;

! TODO: Need to go through verb tags here and make sure everything is in the order it is in
!       these reduced forms.
!
!       +V+PERSON+Ind+TENSE+etc

! TODO: These are reduced forms for subordinate clauses
! TODO: Rel+Nom Rel+Abs +Red?

! They are invariable, but they need person marking.

! TODO: ahu?

LEXICON Ah_Clause_Case

    ah+V+1Sg+Ind+Pres+Red+Abs:a´h       Clitics ;
    ah+V+2Sg+Ind+Pres+Red+Abs:a´h       Clitics ;
    ah+V+3SgM+Ind+Pres+Red+Abs:a´h      Clitics ;
    ah+V+3SgF+Ind+Pres+Red+Abs:a´h      Clitics ;
    ah+V+1Pl+Ind+Pres+Red+Abs:a´h       Clitics ;
    ah+V+2Pl+Ind+Pres+Red+Abs:a´h       Clitics ;
    ah+V+3Pl+Ind+Pres+Red+Abs:a´h       Clitics ;

    ah+V+1Sg+Ind+Pres+Red+Nom:ihi       Clitics ;
    ah+V+2Sg+Ind+Pres+Red+Nom:ihi       Clitics ;
    ah+V+3SgM+Ind+Pres+Red+Nom:ihi      Clitics ;
    ah+V+3SgF+Ind+Pres+Red+Nom:ihi      Clitics ;
    ah+V+1Pl+Ind+Pres+Red+Nom:ihi       Clitics ;
    ah+V+2Pl+Ind+Pres+Red+Nom:ihi       Clitics ;
    ah+V+3Pl+Ind+Pres+Red+Nom:ihi       Clitics ;

    ! TODO: fid a way to check this. appears to be for subj of subord. and subj of matrix
    ah+V+1Sg+Ind+Pres+Red+Nom:a´hu      Clitics ;
    ah+V+2Sg+Ind+Pres+Red+Nom:a´hu      Clitics ;
    ah+V+3SgM+Ind+Pres+Red+Nom:a´hu         Clitics ;
    ah+V+3SgF+Ind+Pres+Red+Nom:a´hu         Clitics ;
    ah+V+1Pl+Ind+Pres+Red+Nom:a´hu      Clitics ;
    ah+V+2Pl+Ind+Pres+Red+Nom:a´hu      Clitics ;
    ah+V+3Pl+Ind+Pres+Red+Nom:a´hu      Clitics ;


LEXICON Ah_Opt
    ah+V+Pres+Opt+Neg+1Sg:ya´anan         Clitics ;
    ah+V+Pres+Opt+Neg+2Sg:ya´anad        Clitics ;
    ah+V+Pres+Opt+Neg+3SgM:ya´anu    Clitics ;
    ah+V+Pres+Opt+Neg+3SgF:ya´anay     Clitics ;

    ah+V+Pres+Opt+Neg+1PlIncl:ya´anan     Clitics ;
    ah+V+Pres+Opt+Neg+1PlIncl:ya´anannu     Clitics ;
    ah+V+Pres+Opt+Neg+1PlExcl:ya´anan     Clitics ;
    ah+V+Pres+Opt+Neg+1PlExcl:ya´anannu     Clitics ;

    ah+V+Pres+Opt+Neg+2Pl:ya´anad      Clitics ;
    ah+V+Pres+Opt+Neg+3Pl:ya´anay       Clitics ;


LEXICON Ah_Cond
    ah+V+Pres+Cond+1Sg:lahaa          Clitics ;
    ah+V+Pres+Cond+2Sg:lahaa        Clitics ;
    ah+V+Pres+Cond+3SgM:lahaa    Clitics ;
    ah+V+Pres+Cond+3SgF:lahayd     Clitics ;

    ah+V+Pres+Cond+1PlIncl:lahayn     Clitics ;
    ah+V+Pres+Cond+1PlExcl:lahayn     Clitics ;
    ah+V+Pres+Cond+2Pl:lahaydeen       Clitics ;
    ah+V+Pres+Cond+3Pl:lahaayeen       Clitics ;


LEXICON prefixing
    iman+V+IV:      IMAN "come" ;
    aqoon+V:    AQOON "know, recognize" ;
    odhan+V+IV: ODHAN "say" ;
    oolli+V+IV: OOLLI "be in a place" ;
    lee+V+V/:lee    Ah  "have" ;        ! lee+V+V/ah


    ! TODO: ah is one of these verbs


LEXICON AQOON
    +Inf:aqoon Clitics ; ! aqoo´n ! check inf form
    +Ind+Past:  AQOON/GenPast ;
    +Ind+Past:  AQOON/GenPastRedAbs ; ! +Red tag after
    +Ind+Past:  AQOON/GenPastRedNom ; ! +Red tag after
    +Neg+Past:  AQOON/GenPastNeg ;

    +Ind+Pres:  AQOON/GenPres ;
    +Ind+Pres:  AQOON/GenPresRedAbs ; ! +Red tag after
    +Ind+Pres:  AQOON/GenPresRedNom ; ! +Red tag after
    +Neg+Pres:  AQOON/GenPresNeg ;
    +Ind+Pres:  AQOON/GenPresRel ; ! +Rel tag after

    +Ind+Pres:  AQOON/GenPresAlt ;
    +Ind+Pres:  AQOON/GenPresRedAbsAlt ; ! +Red tag after

    +Imp:       AQOON/Imp ;

    ! Barrier and  necessary for Prog.
    :aqoon%>        Progressive ; ! ima´n ; TODO: +Ind tag comes in at some odd place.
    +Neg+Prog+Pres:oqoon            Clitics ;       ! oqoo´n
    +Neg+Prog+Past:oqoonaynin       Clitics ;   ! oqoonayni´n


! Following lexicons only have Person, Reduced and Sty tags.
LEXICON AQOON/GenPast
      +1Sg:iqiin            Clitics ;
     +2Sg:tiqiin            Clitics ;
    +3SgM:yiqiin            Clitics ;
    +3SgF:tiqiin            Clitics ;
     +1Pl:niqiin            Clitics ;
    +2Pl:tiqiinneen     Clitics ;
    +3Pl:yiqiinneen     Clitics ;

LEXICON AQOON/GenPastRedAbs
      +1Sg+Red:iqii´n           Clitics ; !  iqii´n
     +2Sg+Red:yiqii´n           Clitics ; ! yiqii´n
    +3SgM+Red:yiqii´n           Clitics ; ! yiqii´n
    +3SgF+Red:tiqii´n           Clitics ; ! tiqii´n
     +1Pl+Red:niqii´n           Clitics ; ! niqii´n
    +2Pl+Red:yiqii´n            Clitics ; ! yiqii´n
    +3Pl+Red:yiqii´n            Clitics ; ! yiqii´n

! TODO: Check this.
LEXICON AQOON/GenPastRedNom
      +1Sg+Red+Nom:aqaannaa         Clitics ;
     +2Sg+Red+Nom:yaqaannaa         Clitics ;
    +3SgM+Red+Nom:yaqaannaa         Clitics ;
    +3SgF+Red+Nom:taqaannaa         Clitics ;
     +1Pl+Red+Nom:naqaannaa         Clitics ;
    +2Pl+Red+Nom:yaqaannaanaa           Clitics ;
    +3Pl+Red+Nom:yaqaannaanaa           Clitics ;

    ! NOTE: NG forms without geminate
      +1Sg+Red+Nom:aqaanaa          Clitics/NG ;
     +2Sg+Red+Nom:yaqaanaa          Clitics/NG ;
    +3SgM+Red+Nom:yaqaanaa          Clitics/NG ;
    +3SgF+Red+Nom:taqaanaa          Clitics/NG ;
     +1Pl+Red+Nom:naqaanaa          Clitics/NG ;
    +2Pl+Red+Nom:yaqaanaanaa            Clitics/NG ;
    +3Pl+Red+Nom:yaqaanaanaa            Clitics/NG ;


LEXICON AQOON/GenPastNeg
    +Sg:oqoo´n               Clitics ; ! oqoo´n
    +Pl:oqooni´n             Clitics ; ! oqooni´n
    +Sg+Sty/TODO:aqoo´n      Clitics ; ! aqoo´n
    +Pl+Sty/TODO:aqooni´n   Clitics ; ! aqooni´n

LEXICON AQOON/GenPres
      +1Sg:aqaan            Clitics ;
     +2Sg:taqaan            Clitics ;
    +3SgM:yaqaan            Clitics ;
    +3SgF:taqaan            Clitics ;
     +1Pl:naqaan            Clitics ;
    +2Pl:taqaanniin     Clitics ;
    +3Pl:yaqaanniin     Clitics ;


! TODO: check this.
LEXICON AQOON/GenPresRedNom
      +1Sg+Red+Nom:aqaa´n           Clitics ;   !  aqaa´n
     +2Sg+Red+Nom:yaqaa´n           Clitics ;   ! yaqaa´n
    +3SgM+Red+Nom:yaqaa´n           Clitics ;   ! yaqaa´n
    +3SgF+Red+Nom:taqaa´n           Clitics ;   ! taqaa´n
     +1Pl+Red+Nom:naqaa´n           Clitics ;   ! naqaa´n
    +2Pl+Red+Nom:yaqaa´n            Clitics ;   ! yaqaa´n
    +3Pl+Red+Nom:yaqaa´n            Clitics ;   ! yaqaa´n

! Abs
LEXICON AQOON/GenPresRedAbs
      +1Sg+Red+Abs:aqaa´n           Clitics ;   !  aqaa´n
     +2Sg+Red+Abs:yaqaa´n           Clitics ;   ! yaqaa´n
    +3SgM+Red+Abs:yaqaa´n           Clitics ;   ! yaqaa´n
    +3SgF+Red+Abs:taqaa´n           Clitics ;   ! taqaa´n
     +1Pl+Red+Abs:naqaa´n           Clitics ;   ! naqaa´n
    +2Pl+Red+Abs:yaqaa´n            Clitics ;   ! yaqaa´n
    +3Pl+Red+Abs:yaqaa´n            Clitics ;   ! yaqaa´n

LEXICON AQOON/GenPresRel
      +1Sg+Rel:aqaanno´         Clitics ;   !    aqaanno´
     +2Sg+Rel:yaqaanno´         Clitics ;   !   yaqaanno´
    +3SgM+Rel:yaqaanno´         Clitics ;   !   yaqaanno´
    +3SgF+Rel:taqaanno´         Clitics ;   !   taqaanno´
     +1Pl+Rel:naqaanno´         Clitics ;   !   naqaanno´
    +2Pl+Rel:yaqaannaan´´           Clitics ;   !   yaqaannaan´´
    +3Pl+Rel:yaqaannaan´´           Clitics ;   !   yaqaannaan´´

    ! NOTE: NG forms without geminate
      +1Sg+Rel:aqaano´          Clitics/NG ;    !    aqaano´
     +2Sg+Rel:yaqaano´          Clitics/NG ;    !   yaqaano´
    +3SgM+Rel:yaqaano´          Clitics/NG ;    !   yaqaano´
    +3SgF+Rel:taqaano´          Clitics/NG ;    !   taqaano´
     +1Pl+Rel:naqaano´          Clitics/NG ;    !   naqaanno´
    +2Pl+Rel:yaqaanaan´´            Clitics/NG ;    !   yaqaanaan´´
    +3Pl+Rel:yaqaanaan´´            Clitics/NG ;    !   yaqaanaan´´



LEXICON AQOON/GenPresNeg
      +1Sg:aqaa´n           Clitics ;     !  aqaa´n
     +2Sg:taqaa´n           Clitics ;     ! taqaa´n
    +3SgM:yaqaa´n           Clitics ;     ! yaqaa´n
    +3SgF:taqaa´n           Clitics ;     ! taqaa´n
     +1Pl:naqaa´n           Clitics ;     ! naqaa´n
    +2Pl:taqaanni´in        Clitics ;     ! taqaanni´in
    +3Pl:yaqaanni´in        Clitics ;     ! yaqaanni´in
